Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-4,147.02
Hazardous materials endorsement; USA PATRIOT Act requirements.

No endorsement authorizing the driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials shall be issued, renewed, or transferred by the Department of Motor Vehicles unless the endorsement is issued, renewed, or transferred in conformance with the requirements of section 1012 of the federal Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, USA PATRIOT Act, 49 U.S.C. 5103a, including all amendments and federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto as of the date specified in section 60-201, for the issuance of licenses to operate commercial motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials.

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB805, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 35;

Laws 2013, LB35, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB776, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB313, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 67;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 89;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 16;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 63;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 14;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 62;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 30;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 42;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 47.